California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
An affidavit made under this chapter shall conform to the standards prescribed for an affidavit made pursuant to Section 437c.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.050.

The times provided in this chapter, or in any other statute relating to a bond given in an action or proceeding, may be extended pursuant to Sections 1054 and 1054.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.110.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.120.

(a) “Admitted surety insurer” means a corporate insurer or a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange to which the Insurance Commissioner has issued a certificate of authority to transact surety insurance in this state, as defined in Section 105 of the Insurance Code.

(b) For the purpose of application of this chapter to a bond given pursuant to any statute of this state, the phrases “admitted surety insurer,” “authorized surety company,” “bonding company,” “corporate surety,” and comparable phrases used in the statute mean “admitted surety insurer” as defined in this
section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.130.

(a) “Beneficiary” means the person for whose benefit a bond is given, whether executed to, in favor of, in the name of, or payable to the person as an obligee.

(b) If a bond is given for the benefit of the State of California or the people of the state, “beneficiary” means the court, officer, or other person required to determine the sufficiency of the sureties or to approve the bond.

(c) For the purpose of application of this chapter to a bond given pursuant to any statute of this state, the terms
“beneficiary,” “obligee,” and comparable terms used in the statute mean “beneficiary” as defined in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.140.

(a) “Bond” includes both of the following:

(1) A surety, indemnity, fiduciary, or like bond executed by both the principal and sureties.

(2) A surety, indemnity, fiduciary, or like undertaking executed by the sureties alone.

(b) A bond provided for or given “in an action or proceeding” does not include a bond provided for, or given as, a condition of a license or permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.150.

“Court” means, if a bond is given in an action or proceeding, the court in which the action or proceeding is pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.160.

“Officer” means the sheriff, marshal, clerk of court, judge or magistrate (if there is no clerk), board, commission, department, or other public official or entity to whom the bond is given or with whom a copy of the bond is filed or who is required to determine the sufficiency of the sureties or to approve the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

995.170.

(a) “Principal” means the person who gives a bond.

(b) For the purpose of application of this chapter to a bond given pursuant to any statute of this state, the terms “obligor,” “principal,” and comparable terms used in the statute mean “principal” as defined in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.180.

“Statute” includes administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.185.

(a) “Surety” has the meaning provided in Section 2787 of the Civil Code and includes personal surety and admitted surety insurer.

(b) For the purpose of application of this chapter to a bond given pursuant to any statute of this state, the terms “bail,” “guarantor,” “bondsman,” “surety,” and comparable terms used in the statute mean “surety” as defined in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.190.

“Undertaking” means a surety, indemnity, fiduciary, or like undertaking executed by the sureties alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [995.210. - 995.260.]

995.210.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires:

(a) If a statute provides for a bond, an undertaking that otherwise satisfies the requirements for the bond may be given in its place with the same effect as if a bond were given, and references in the statute to the bond shall be deemed to be references to the undertaking.

(b) If a statute provides for an undertaking, a bond that otherwise satisfies the requirements for the undertaking may be given in its place with the same effect as if an undertaking were given, and
references in the statute to the undertaking shall be deemed to be references to the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.220.

Notwithstanding any other statute, if a statute provides for a bond in an action or proceeding, including but not limited to a bond for issuance of a restraining order or injunction, appointment of a receiver, or stay of enforcement of a judgment on appeal, the following public entities and officers are not required to give the bond and shall have the same rights, remedies, and benefits as if the bond were given:

(a) The State of California or the people of the state, a state agency, department, division, commission, board, or other entity of the state, or a state officer in an official
capacity or on behalf of the state.

(b) A county, city, or district, or public authority, public agency, or other political subdivision in the state, or an officer of the local public entity in an official capacity or on behalf of the local public entity.

(c) The United States or an instrumentality or agency of the United States, or a federal officer in an official capacity or on behalf of the United States or instrumentality or agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.230.

The beneficiary of a bond given in an action or proceeding may in writing consent to the bond in an amount less than the amount required by statute or may waive the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.240.

The court may, in its discretion, waive a provision for a bond in an action or proceeding and make such orders as may be appropriate as if the bond were given, if the court determines that the principal is unable to give the bond because the principal is indigent and is unable to obtain sufficient sureties, whether personal or admitted surety insurers. In exercising its discretion the court shall take into consideration all factors it deems relevant, including but not limited to the character of the action or proceeding, the nature of the beneficiary, whether public or private, and the potential harm to the beneficiary if the provision for the bond is
waived.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.250.

If a statute allows costs to a party in an action or proceeding, the costs shall include all of the following:

(a) The premium on a bond reasonably paid by the party pursuant to a statute that provides for the bond in the action or proceeding.

(b) The premium on a bond reasonably paid by the party in connection with the action or proceeding, unless the court determines that the bond was unnecessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.260.

If a bond is recorded pursuant to statute, a certified copy of the record of the bond with all affidavits, acknowledgments, endorsements, and attachments may be admitted in evidence in an action or proceeding with the same effect as the original, without further proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Execution and Filing [995.310. - 995.380.]

995.310.

Unless the statute providing for the bond requires execution by an admitted surety insurer, a bond shall be executed by two or more sufficient personal sureties or by one sufficient admitted surety insurer or by any combination of sufficient personal sureties and admitted surety insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.311.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any bond required on a public works contract, as defined in Section 1101 of the Public Contract Code, shall be executed by an admitted surety insurer. A public agency approving the bond on a public works contract shall have a duty to verify that the bond is being executed by an admitted surety insurer.

(b) A public agency may fulfill its duty under subdivision (a) by verifying the status of the party executing the bond in one
of the following ways:

(1) Printing out information from the website of the Department of Insurance confirming the surety is an admitted surety insurer and attaching it to the bond.

(2) Obtaining a certificate from the county clerk that confirms the surety is an admitted insurer and attaching it to the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

995.320.

(a) A bond shall be in writing signed by the sureties under oath and shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement that the sureties are jointly and severally liable on the obligations of the statute providing for the bond.

(2) The address at which the principal and sureties may be served with notices, papers, and other documents under this chapter.

(3) If the amount of the bond is based upon the value of property or an interest in
property, a description of the property or interest, and the principal’s estimate of the value of the property or interest, or if given pursuant to the estimate of the beneficiary or court, the value as so estimated.

(b) The sureties signing the bond are jointly and severally liable on the obligations of the bond, the provisions of this chapter, and the statute providing for the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.330.

A bond or undertaking given in an action or proceeding may be in the following form:

“(Title of court. Title of cause.)

Whereas the ... desires to give (a bond) (an undertaking) for (state what) as provided by (state sections of code requiring bond or undertaking); now, therefore, the undersigned (principal and) (sureties) (surety) hereby (obligate ourselves, jointly and severally) (obligates itself) to (name who) under the statutory obligations, in the amount of ... dollars.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.340.

If a bond is given in an action or proceeding:

(a) The bond shall be filed with the court unless the statute providing for the bond requires that the bond be given to another person.

(b) If the statute providing for the bond requires that the bond be given to an officer, the officer shall file the bond with the court unless the statute providing for the bond otherwise provides.

(c) A bond filed with the court shall be preserved in the office of the clerk of
the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.350.

(a) Upon the filing of a bond with the court in an action or proceeding, the clerk shall enter in the register of actions the following information: 

(1) The date and amount of the bond.

(2) The names of the sureties on the bond.

(b) In the event of the loss of the bond, the entries in the register of actions are prima facie evidence of the giving of the bond in the manner required by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.360.

A bond given in an action or proceeding may be withdrawn from the file and returned to the principal on order of the court only if one of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) The beneficiary so stipulates.

(b) The bond is no longer in force and effect and the time during which the liability on the bond may be enforced has expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.370.

At the time a bond is given, the principal shall serve a copy of the bond on the beneficiary. An affidavit of service shall be given and filed with the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.380.

(a) If a bond does not contain the substantial matter or conditions required by this chapter or by the statute providing for the bond, or if there are any defects in the giving or filing of the bond, the bond is not void so as to release the principal and sureties from liability.

(b) The beneficiary may, in proceedings to enforce the liability on the bond, suggest the defect in the bond, or its giving or filing, and enforce the liability against the principal and the persons who intended to become and were included as sureties on the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Approval and Effect [995.410. - 995.440.]

995.410.

(a) A bond becomes effective without approval unless the statute providing for the bond requires that the bond be approved by the court or officer. 

(b) If the statute providing for a bond requires that the bond be approved, the court or officer may approve or disapprove the bond on the basis of the affidavit or certificate of the sureties or may require the attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence and may examine the sureties under oath touching their qualifications.

(c) Nothing shall be
construed to preclude approval of a bond in an amount greater than that required by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.420.

(a) Unless the statute providing for a bond provides that the bond becomes effective at a different time, a bond is effective at the time it is given or, if the statute requires that the bond be approved, at the time it is approved.

(b) If the statute providing for a bond provides that the bond becomes effective at a time other than the time it is given or approved, the bond is effective at the time provided unless an objection is made to the bond before that time. If an objection is made to a bond before the time provided, the bond becomes effective when the court
makes an order determining the sufficiency of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.430.

A bond remains in force and effect until the earliest of the following events:

(a) The sureties withdraw from or cancel the bond or a new bond is given in place of the original bond.

(b) The purpose for which the bond was given is satisfied or the purpose is abandoned without any liability having been incurred.

(c) A judgment of liability on the bond that exhausts the amount of the bond is satisfied.

(d) The term of the bond expires. Unless the statute providing for the bond prescribes a fixed term, the bond is continuous.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.440.

A bond given as a condition of a license or permit shall be continuous in form, remain in full force and effect, and run concurrently with the license or permit period and any and all renewals, or until cancellation or withdrawal of the surety from the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Personal Sureties [995.510. - 995.520.]

995.510.

(a) A personal surety on a bond is sufficient if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The surety is a person other than the principal. No officer of the court or member of the State Bar shall act as a surety.

(2) The surety is a resident, and either an owner of real property or householder, within the state.

(3) The surety is worth the amount of the bond in real or personal property, or both, situated in this state, over and
above all debts and liabilities, exclusive of property exempt from enforcement of a money judgment.

(b) If the amount of a bond exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and is executed by more than two personal sureties, the worth of a personal surety may be less than the amount of the bond, so long as the aggregate worth of all sureties executing the bond is twice the amount of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.520.

(a) A bond executed by personal sureties shall be accompanied by an affidavit of qualifications of each surety.

(b) The affidavit shall contain all of the following information:

(1) The name, occupation, residence address, and business address (if any) of the surety.

(2) A statement that the surety is a resident, and either an owner of real property or householder, within the state.

(3) A statement that the surety is worth the amount of the bond in real or personal property, or both, situated in this state, over and above all debts and liabilities, exclusive of property exempt from enforcement of a money judgment.

(c) If the amount of the bond exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), the affidavit shall contain, in addition to the information required by subdivision (b), all of the following information:

(1) A description sufficient for identification of real and personal property of the surety situated in this state and the nature of the surety’s interest therein that qualifies the surety on the bond.

(2) The surety’s best estimate of the fair market value of each item of property.

(3) A statement of any charge or lien
and its amount, known to the surety, whether of public record or not, against any item of property.

(4) Any other impediment or cloud known to the surety on the free right of possession, use, benefit, or enjoyment of the property.

(d) If the amount of the bond exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and is executed by more than two sureties, the affidavit may state that the surety is worth less than the amount of the bond and the bond may stipulate that the liability of the surety is limited to the worth of the surety stated in the affidavit, so long as the aggregate worth of all sureties executing the bond is twice the amount of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Admitted Surety Insurers [995.610. - 995.675.]

995.610.

(a) If a statute provides for a bond with any number of sureties, one sufficient admitted surety insurer may become and shall be accepted as sole surety on the bond.

(b) The admitted surety insurer is subject to all the liabilities and entitled to all the rights of personal sureties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.620.

Two or more admitted surety insurers may be sureties on a bond by executing the same or separate bonds for amounts aggregating the required amount of the bond. Each admitted surety insurer is jointly and severally liable to the extent of the amount of the liability assumed by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.630.

An admitted surety insurer shall be accepted or approved by the court or officer as surety on a bond without further acknowledgment if the bond is executed in the name of the surety insurer under penalty of perjury or the fact of execution of the bond is duly acknowledged before an officer authorized to take and certify acknowledgments, and either one of the following conditions, at the option of the surety insurer, is satisfied:

(a) A copy of the transcript or record of the unrevoked
appointment, power of attorney, bylaws, or other instrument, duly certified by the proper authority and attested by the seal of the insurer entitling or authorizing the person who executed the bond to do so for and in behalf of the insurer, is filed in the office of the clerk of the county in which the court or officer is located.

(b) A copy of a power of attorney is attached to the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

995.640.

Upon review of the Internet Web site of the Department of Insurance, the county clerk of any county shall, upon request of any person, do any of the following:

(a) Issue a certificate stating whether a surety is admitted or if the certificate of authority of an admitted surety insurer issued by the Insurance Commissioner authorizing the insurer to transact surety insurance has been surrendered, revoked, canceled, annulled, or suspended, and, in the event that it has, whether renewed authority
has been granted. The county clerk in issuing the certificate shall rely solely upon the information furnished by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12070) of Chapter 1 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(b) Issue a certificate stating whether a copy of the transcript or record of the unrevoked appointment, power of attorney, bylaws, or other instrument, duly certified by the proper authority and attested by the seal of an admitted surety insurer entitling or authorizing the person who executed a bond to do so for and on behalf of the insurer, is filed in the office of the clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

995.650.

If an objection is made to the sufficiency of an admitted surety insurer, the person making the objection shall attach to and incorporate in the objection one or both of the following:

(a) The certificate of the county clerk of the county in which the court is located stating that the insurer is not listed as an admitted surety insurer on the department’s Internet Web site or that the certificate of authority of the insurer has been surrendered, revoked, canceled, annulled, or suspended and
has not been renewed.

(b) An affidavit stating facts that establish the insufficiency of the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 351, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

995.660.

(a) If an objection is made to the sufficiency of an admitted surety insurer on a bond or if the bond is required to be approved, the insurer shall submit to the court or officer the following documents:

(1) The original, or a certified copy, of the unrevoked appointment, power of attorney, bylaws, or other instrument entitling or authorizing the person who executed the bond to do so, within 10 calendar days of the insurer’s receipt of a request to submit the
instrument.

(2) A certified copy of the certificate of authority of the insurer issued by the Insurance Commissioner, within 10 calendar days of the insurer’s receipt of a request to submit the copy.

(3) A certificate from the clerk of the county in which the court or officer is located that the certificate of authority of the insurer has not been surrendered, revoked, canceled, annulled, or suspended or, in the event that it has, that renewed authority has been granted, within 10 calendar days of the insurer’s receipt of the certificate.

(4) Copies of the insurer’s most recent annual statement and quarterly statement filed with the Department of Insurance pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 900) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, within 10 calendar days of the insurer’s receipt
of a request to submit the statements.

(b) If the admitted surety insurer complies with subdivision (a), and if it appears that the bond was duly executed, that the insurer is authorized to transact surety insurance in the state, and that its assets exceed its liabilities in an amount equal to or in excess of the amount of the bond, the insurer is sufficient and shall be accepted or approved as surety on the bond, subject to Section 12090 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

995.670.

(a) This section applies to a bond executed, filed, posted, furnished, or otherwise given as security pursuant to any statute of this state or any law or ordinance of a public agency.

No public agency shall require an admitted surety insurer to comply with any requirements other than those in Section 995.660 whenever an objection is made to the sufficiency of the admitted surety insurer on the bond or if the bond is required to be approved.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “public agency” means the state, any agency or authority, any city, county, city and county, district, municipal or public corporation, or any instrumentality thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 487, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

995.675.

Notwithstanding Sections 995.660 and 995.670, the California Integrated Waste Management Board, the State Water Resources Control Board, and the Department of Toxic Substances Control may require, in order to comply with Subtitle C or Subtitle D of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.), an admitted surety insurer to be listed in Circular 570 issued by the United States Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 477, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Deposit in Lieu of Bond [995.710. - 995.770.]

995.710.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e) or to the extent the statute providing for a bond precludes a deposit in lieu of bond or limits the form of deposit, the principal may, without prior court approval, instead of giving a bond, deposit with the officer any of the following:

(1) Lawful money of the United States or a cashier’s check, made payable to the officer, issued by a bank, savings association, or credit union authorized to do business in this state. The money shall be held in trust by the officer in interest-bearing deposit or share accounts.

(2) Bonds or notes, including bearer bonds and bearer notes, of the United States or the State of California. The deposit of a bond or note pursuant
 to this section shall be accomplished by filing with the court, and serving upon all parties and the appropriate officer of the bank holding the bond or note, instructions executed by the person or entity holding title to the bond or note that the treasurer of the county where the judgment was entered is the custodian of that account for the purpose of staying enforcement of the judgment, and that the title holder assigns to the treasurer the right to collect, sell, or otherwise apply the bond or note to enforce the judgment debtor’s liability pursuant to Section 995.760.

(3) Certificates of deposit payable to the officer, not exceeding the federally insured amount, issued by banks or savings associations authorized to do business in this state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(4) Savings accounts assigned to the officer, not exceeding the federally
 insured amount, together with evidence of the deposit in the savings accounts with banks authorized to do business in this state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(5) Investment certificates or share accounts assigned to the officer, not exceeding the federally insured amount, issued by savings associations authorized to do business in this state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(6) Share certificates payable to the officer, not exceeding the guaranteed or insured amount, issued by a credit union, as defined in Section 14002 of the Financial Code, whose share accounts are insured by the National Credit Union Administration or guaranteed or insured by any other agency that the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation has not deemed to be unsatisfactory.

(b) The deposit shall be in an amount or have a face value, or, in the case of bonds or notes, have a market value, equal to or in excess of the amount that would be required to be secured by the bond if the bond were given by an admitted surety insurer. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the case of a deposit of bonds or notes other than in an action or proceeding, the officer may, in the officer’s discretion, require that the amount of the deposit be determined not by the market value of the bonds or notes but by a formula based on the principal amount of the bonds or notes.

(c) The deposit shall be accompanied by an agreement executed by the principal authorizing the officer to collect, sell, or otherwise apply the deposit to enforce the liability of the principal on the deposit. The agreement shall include the address at which the principal may be served with notices, papers, and other documents under this
 chapter.

(d) The officer may prescribe terms and conditions to implement this section.

(e) This section does not apply to deposits with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 41.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

995.720.

(a) The market value of bonds or notes, including bearer bonds and bearer notes, shall be agreed upon by stipulation of the principal and beneficiary or, if the bonds or notes are given in an action or proceeding and the principal and beneficiary are unable to agree, the market value shall be determined by court order in the manner prescribed in this section. A certified copy of the stipulation or
court order shall be delivered to the officer at the time of the deposit of the bonds or notes.

(b) If the bonds or notes are given in an action or proceeding, the principal may file a written application with the court to determine the market value of the bonds or notes. The application shall be served upon the beneficiary and proof of service shall be filed with the application. The application shall contain all of the following:

(1) A specific description of the bonds or notes.

(2) A statement of the current market value of the bonds or notes as of the date of the filing of the application.

(3) A statement of the amount of the bonds or notes that the principal believes would be equal to the required amount of the deposit.

(c) The application pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be heard by the court not less than five days or more than 10 days after service of the application. If at the time of the hearing no objection is made to the current market value of the bonds or notes alleged in the application, the court shall fix the amount of the bonds or notes on the basis of the market value alleged in the application. If the beneficiary contends that the current market value of the bonds or notes is less than alleged in the application, the principal shall offer evidence in support of the application, and the beneficiary may offer evidence in opposition. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall make an order determining the market value of the bonds or notes and shall fix and determine the amount of the bonds or notes to be deposited by the principal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 305, Sec. 2.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

995.730.

A deposit given instead of a bond has the same force and effect, is treated the same, and is subject to the same conditions, liability, and statutory provisions, including provisions for increase and decrease of amount, as the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.740.

If no proceedings are pending to enforce the liability of the principal on the deposit, the officer shall:

(a) Pay quarterly, on demand, any interest on the deposit, when earned in accordance with the terms of the account or certificate, to the principal.

(b) Deliver to the principal, on
demand, any interest coupons attached to bonds or notes, including bearer bonds and bearer notes, as the interest coupons become due and payable, or pay annually any interest payable on the bonds or notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 305, Sec. 3.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

995.750.

(a) The principal shall pay the amount of the liability on the deposit within 30 days after the date on which the judgment of liability becomes final.

(b) If the deposit was given to stay enforcement of a judgment on appeal, the principal shall pay the amount of the liability on the deposit, including damages and costs awarded against the principal on appeal, within 30 days after the filing of the remittitur from the appellate court in the court from which the appeal is taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.760.

(a) If the principal does not pay the amount of the liability on the deposit within the time prescribed in Section 995.750, the deposit shall be collected, sold, or otherwise applied to the liability upon order of the court that entered the judgment of liability, made upon five days’ notice to the parties.

(b) Bonds or notes, including
bearer bonds and bearer notes, without a prevailing market price shall be sold at public auction. Notice of sale shall be served on the principal. Bonds or notes having a prevailing market price may be sold at private sale at a price not lower than the prevailing market price.

(c) The deposit shall be distributed in the following order:

(1) First, to pay the cost of collection, sale, or other application of the deposit.

(2) Second, to pay the judgment of liability of the principal on the deposit.

(3) Third, the remainder, if any, shall be returned to the principal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 305, Sec. 4.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

995.770.

A deposit given pursuant to this article shall be returned to the principal at the earliest of the following times:

(a) Upon substitution of a sufficient bond for the deposit. The bond shall be in full force and effect for all liabilities incurred, and for acts, omissions, or causes existing or which arose, during the period the deposit was in effect. 

(b) The time provided by Section 995.360 for return of a bond.

(c) The time provided by statute for return of
the deposit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Bonds to the State of California [995.810. - 995.850.]

995.810.

The provisions of this article apply to a bond executed to, in favor of, in the name of, or payable to the State of California or the people of the state, including but not limited to an official bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.820.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, a bond given by an officer of the court for the faithful discharge of the officer’s duties and obedience to the orders of the court shall be to the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.830.

If a statute or court order pursuant thereto providing for a bond does not specify the beneficiary of the bond, the bond shall be to the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.840.

If a bond under this article is given in an action or proceeding:

(a) The bond shall be approved by the court.

(b) Any party for whose benefit the bond is given may object to the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.850.

(a) The liability on a bond under this article may be enforced by or for the benefit of, and in the name of, any and all persons for whose benefit the bond is given who are damaged by breach of the condition of the bond.

(b) A person described in subdivision (a) may, in addition to any other remedy the person has, enforce the liability on the bond in the person’s own name, without assignment of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Objections to Bonds [995.910. - 995.960.]

995.910.

This article governs objections to a bond given in an action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.920.

The beneficiary may object to a bond on any of the following grounds:

(a) The sureties are insufficient.

(b) The amount of the bond is insufficient.

(c) The bond, from any other cause, is insufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.930.

(a) An objection shall be in writing and shall be made by noticed motion. The notice of motion shall specify the precise grounds for the objection. If a ground for the objection is that the amount of the bond is insufficient, the notice of motion shall state the reason for the insufficiency and shall include an estimate of the amount that would be sufficient.

(b) The objection shall be made within 10 days after service of a copy of the bond on the beneficiary or such other time as is required by the statute providing for the bond.

(c) If no objection is made within the time required by statute, the beneficiary is deemed to have waived all objections except upon a showing of good cause for failure to make the objection within the time required by statute or of changed circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

995.940.

If a ground for the objection is that the value of property or an interest in property on which the amount of the bond is based exceeds the value estimated in the bond:

(a) The objection shall state the beneficiary’s estimate of the market value of the property or interest in property.

(b) The principal may accept the beneficiary’s estimate of the market value of the property or interest in property and immediately file an increased bond based on the estimate. In such case, no hearing shall be held on that ground for the
objection, and the beneficiary is bound by the estimate of the market value of the property or interest in property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.950.

(a) Unless the parties otherwise agree, the hearing on an objection shall be held not less than two or more than five days after service of the notice of motion.

(b) The hearing shall be conducted in such manner as the court determines is proper. The court may permit witnesses to attend and testify and evidence to be procured and introduced in the same manner as in the trial of a civil case.

(c) If the value of property or an interest in property is a ground for the objection, the court shall estimate